Indiana, session 2026, HB1412.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-8-14.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 14.9. Coverage for Acquired Brain Injury Treatment
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a policy of accident and sickness
insurance that is issued, delivered, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "acquired brain injury" means
an injury to the brain that:
(1) occurs after birth; and
(2) is caused by:
(A) an infectious disease;
(B) a metabolic disorder;
(C) an endocrine disorder;
(D) diminished oxygen;
(E) a brain tumor;
(F) a toxin;
(G) a disease that affects the blood supply to the brain;
2026 IN 1412—LS 6417/DI 154


(H) a stroke;
(I) a traumatic brain injury; or
(J) any other related disease, disorder, or condition.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "cognitive communication
therapy" means therapy designed to address cognitive
impairments that:
(1) are caused by an acquired brain injury; and
(2) affect all modalities of comprehension and expression,
including reading, writing, and verbal expression of
information.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "cognitive rehabilitation
therapy" means therapy that is designed to help an individual
relearn cognitive skills that have been impaired due to an acquired
brain injury.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "community reintegration
services" means services that provide therapeutic training to
develop skills essential for an individual who has experienced an
acquired brain injury to:
(1) participate in life;
(2) reenter employment;
(3) attend school;
(4) safely live independently; and
(5) participate in the individual's community.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "functional rehabilitation
therapy" means a structured therapeutic approach to
rehabilitation for an acquired brain injury which emphasizes
learning by doing and focuses on relearning a specific task in a
prescribed format with maximum opportunity for repeated correct
practice.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "insured" means an individual
who is entitled to coverage under a policy of accident and sickness
insurance.
Sec. 8. (a) As used in this chapter, "medically necessary
acquired brain injury treatment" means any treatment for an
acquired brain injury that is consistent with generally accepted
principles of professional medical practice.
(b) The term includes:
(1) cognitive rehabilitation therapy;
(2) cognitive communication therapy;
(3) neurocognitive therapy;
(4) neurobehavioral therapy;
(5) neurofeedback therapy;
2026 IN 1412—LS 6417/DI 154


(6) neuropsychological therapy;
(7) postacute residential treatment;
(8) functional rehabilitation therapy; and
(9) community reintegration services.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "neurobehavioral therapy"
means a set of medical and therapeutic assessments and treatments
focused on behavioral impairments associated with an acquired
brain injury.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "neurocognitive therapy"
means therapeutic services designed to:
(1) address neurological deficits in informational processing
that are caused by an acquired brain injury; and
(2) facilitate the development of higher level cognitive abilities
after an individual has experienced an acquired brain injury.
Sec. 11. As used in this chapter, "neurofeedback therapy"
means therapeutic services that focus on direct training of brain
function to enhance an individual's:
(1) self-regulatory capacity; or
(2) ability to exert control over the individual's behavior,
thoughts, and feelings;
after the individual experiences an acquired brain injury.
Sec. 12. As used in this chapter, "neuropsychological therapy"
means a therapeutic intervention that is designed to improve or
minimize deficits in behavioral and cognitive processes that occur
as a result of an acquired brain injury.
Sec. 13. As used in this chapter, "policy of accident and sickness
insurance" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-5-1. The term does
not include a policy, plan, or coverage set forth in IC 27-8-5-2.5(a).
Sec. 14. As used in this chapter, "postacute residential
treatment" means integrated medical and therapeutic services,
treatments, education, and skills training provided in a home and
community setting after an individual experiences an acquired
brain injury.
Sec. 15. As used in this chapter, "practitioner" means an
individual who plays a role in the treatment of acquired brain
injuries.
Sec. 16. A policy of accident and sickness insurance shall
provide coverage for medically necessary acquired brain injury
treatment provided to an insured.
Sec. 17. The coverage required by this chapter shall not be
subject to any lifetime limitation provisions.
Sec. 18. The coverage required by this chapter shall not be
2026 IN 1412—LS 6417/DI 154


subject to any annual limitation, deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance provisions that are more restrictive than the annual
limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance provisions that
apply generally under the policy of accident and sickness
insurance. Any annual limitation on the coverage required by this
chapter shall be separately stated by the policy of accident and
sickness insurance.
Sec. 19. A practitioner and a treatment facility that provides
acquired brain injury treatment services to an insured shall possess
the appropriate licenses, accreditation, training, and experience
deemed customary and routine in the appropriate trade practice.
SECTION 2. IC 27-13-7-29.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29.1. (a) This section applies to an
individual contract or a group contract that is entered into,
amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Acquired brain injury" means an injury to the brain
that:
(A) occurs after birth; and
(B) is caused by:
(i) an infectious disease;
(ii) a metabolic disorder;
(iii) an endocrine disorder;
(iv) diminished oxygen;
(v) a brain tumor;
(vi) a toxin;
(vii) a disease that affects the blood supply to the brain;
(viii) a stroke;
(ix) a traumatic brain injury; or
(x) any other related disease, disorder, or condition.
(2) "Cognitive communication therapy" means therapy
designed to address cognitive impairments that:
(A) are caused by an acquired brain injury; and
(B) affect all modalities of comprehension and expression,
including reading, writing, and verbal expression of
information.
(3) "Cognitive rehabilitation therapy" means therapy that is
designed to help an individual relearn cognitive skills that
have been impaired due to an acquired brain injury.
(4) "Community reintegration services" means services that
provide therapeutic training to develop skills essential for an
2026 IN 1412—LS 6417/DI 154


individual who has experienced an acquired brain injury to:
(A) participate in life;
(B) reenter employment;
(C) attend school;
(D) safely live independently; and
(E) participate in the individual's community.
(5) "Functional rehabilitation therapy" means a structured
therapeutic approach to rehabilitation for an acquired brain
injury which emphasizes learning by doing and focuses on
relearning a specific task in a prescribed format with
maximum opportunity for repeated correct practice.
(6) "Medically necessary acquired brain injury treatment"
means any treatment for an acquired brain injury that is
consistent with generally accepted principles of professional
medical practice. The term includes:
(A) cognitive rehabilitation therapy;
(B) cognitive communication therapy;
(C) neurocognitive therapy;
(D) neurobehavioral therapy;
(E) neurofeedback therapy;
(F) neuropsychological therapy;
(G) postacute residential treatment;
(H) functional rehabilitation therapy; and
(I) community reintegration services.
(7) "Neurobehavioral therapy" means a set of medical and
therapeutic assessments and treatments focused on behavioral
impairments associated with an acquired brain injury.
(8) "Neurocognitive therapy" means therapeutic services
designed to:
(A) address neurological deficits in informational
processing that are caused by an acquired brain injury;
and
(B) facilitate the development of higher level cognitive
abilities after an individual has experienced an acquired
brain injury.
(9) "Neurofeedback therapy" means therapeutic services that
focus on direct training of brain function to enhance an
individual's:
(A) self-regulatory capacity; or
(B) ability to exert control over the individual's behavior,
thoughts, and feelings;
after the individual experiences an acquired brain injury.
2026 IN 1412—LS 6417/DI 154


(10) "Neuropsychological therapy" means a therapeutic
intervention that is designed to improve or minimize deficits
in behavioral and cognitive processes that occur as a result of
an acquired brain injury.
(11) "Postacute residential treatment" means integrated
medical and therapeutic services, treatments, education, and
skills training provided in a home and community setting
after an individual experiences an acquired brain injury.
(12) "Practitioner" means an individual who plays a role in
the treatment of acquired brain injuries.
(c) An individual contract or a group contract shall provide
coverage for medically necessary acquired brain injury treatment
provided to an enrollee.
(d) The coverage required by this section shall not be subject to
any lifetime limitation provisions.
(e) The coverage required by this section shall not be subject to
any annual limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
provisions that are more restrictive than the annual limitation,
deductible, copayment, or coinsurance provisions that apply
generally under the individual contract or the group contract. Any
annual limitation on the coverage required by this section shall be
separately stated by the individual contract or group contract.
(f) A practitioner and a treatment facility that provides
acquired brain injury treatment services to an enrollee shall
possess the appropriate licenses, accreditation, training, and
experience deemed customary and routine in the appropriate trade
practice.
2026 IN 1412—LS 6417/DI 154